Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Article 9. Holding Companies.

§ 81-14-401.
Holding companies.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any stock savings bank may simultaneously with its incorporation or conversion to a stock savings bank provide for its ownership by a holding company. In the case of a conversion, members of the converting savings bank shall have the right to purchase capital stock of the holding company in lieu of capital stock of the converted savings bank in accordance with Section 81-14-107(3)(f).

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any stock savings bank may reorganize its ownership to provide for ownership by a holding company, upon adoption of a plan of reorganization by a favorable vote of not less than two-thirds (2/3) of the members of the board of directors of the savings bank and approval of such plan of reorganization by the holders of not less than a majority of the issued and outstanding shares of stock of the savings bank. The plan of reorganization shall provide that (a) the resulting ownership shall be vested in a Mississippi corporation; (b) all stockholders of the stock savings bank shall have the right to exchange shares; (c) the exchange of stock shall not be subject to state or federal income taxation; (d) stockholders not wishing to exchange shares shall be entitled to dissenters’ rights as provided under Section 79-4-13.01 et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972; and (e) the plan of reorganization is fair and equitable to all stockholders.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any mutual savings bank may reorganize its ownership to provide for ownership by a holding company upon adoption of a plan of reorganization by favorable vote of not less than two-thirds (2/3) of the members of the board of directors of the savings bank and approval of the plan of reorganization by a majority of the voting members of the savings bank. The plan of reorganization shall provide: (a) the resulting ownership of one or more subsidiary savings banks shall be evidenced by stock shares; (b) the substantial portion of the assets and all of the insured deposits and part or all of the other liabilities shall be transferred to one or more subsidiary savings banks; (c) the reorganization shall not be subject to state or federal income taxation; and (d) the plan of reorganization is fair and equitable to all members of the savings bank. The commissioner shall promulgate rules regarding the formation of the subsidiary savings banks and the holding company, including the rights of members, levels of investment in the holding company subsidiaries, and stock sales.

A holding company may invest in any investment authorized by its board of directors, except as limited by regulations promulgated by the commissioner pursuant to this chapter.

Any entity which controls a stock savings bank, or acquires control of a stock savings bank, is a holding company. As used in this section, “entity” means an individual, corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, estate or unincorporated association.

Holding companies shall be under the supervision of the commissioner. The commissioner shall exercise all powers and responsibilities with respect to holding companies which he exercises with respect to savings banks.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 104; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 106; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 106; Laws, 2016, ch. 336, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 5, 2016).

§ 81-14-403.
Change in control requirement.

Any entity contemplating an action that will result in the change of control of a savings bank or savings bank’s holding company shall first make application to the commissioner for a certificate of approval. Such application shall be in the form prescribed by the commissioner and shall contain such information as he shall require.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter, the commissioner may define “control” by rule and regulation in a manner to ensure uniformity with federal law, regulation and usage.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 105; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 107; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 107, eff from and after July 1, 2001.